Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 39.
VOTER REGISTRATION LAWS.

§ 1. Authority to enact registration law.

The General Assembly shall have power to enact laws providing for a registration of voters prior to any general, special, or primary election, and to require that the right to vote at any such election shall depend upon such previous registration.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by Senate Joint Resolution in the 1947 session (see Acts 1947, p. 1068). It was approved at the general election on Nov. 2, 1948, by a vote of 135,151 for and 71,934 against. See Acts 1949, p. 1412.